Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.220

Assurance of discontinuance of violation.

In the enforcement of this chapter, the attorney general and/or any said prosecuting attorney may accept an assurance of discontinuance from any person deemed in violation of any provisions of this chapter. Any such assurance shall be in writing and shall be filed with and subject to the approval of the superior court of the county in which the alleged violator resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in Thurston county.

[ 2011 c 336 s 538; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 22.]